District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.06g

Wastewater study and testing.

(a)

By July 1, 2013, the Authority shall initiate a study that tests for the presence of endocrine disruptor compounds in wastewater effluent.

(b)

The Authority shall present the findings of the study to the Panel, the General Manager, the Mayor, and the Council within 30 days of the completion of the study.

(c)

The Authority shall be required to implement the provisions of this section upon a transfer by the Chief Financial Officer of the District from the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia to the Authority of the funding necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

(d)

Repealed.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206g
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-240, § 2(b), 59 DCR 14790
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7012(a), 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 34-2202.06e.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-240 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 repealed (d).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010c, see § 2(j) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7010c(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010c, and amendment of this section, see § 2(k) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7010c(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010c, and amendment of this section, see § 2(k) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7016(k)(1) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Legislative history of Law 21-36